New Jersey, session 221, A5260.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  As used in this section: Apparel means: (1) clothing items intended for regular wear or formal occasions, including, but not limited to, undergarments, shirts, pants, skirts, dresses, overalls, bodysuits, costumes, vests, dancewear, suits, saris, scarves, tops, leggings, school uniforms, leisurewear, athletic wear, sports uniforms, everyday swimwear, formal wear, onesies, bibs, diapers, footwear, and everyday uniforms or work-wear; (2) outdoor apparel; and (3) outdoor apparel designed for severe wet conditions, which includes outdoor apparel designed for persons who engage in outdoor sports not marketed for general consumer use to provide health and safety protection against extended exposure to extreme rain conditions or against extended immersion in water or wet conditions, such as from snow. Apparel shall not include personal protective equipment or clothing items for exclusive use by the United States military. Intentionally added PFAS means the same as that term is defined in subsection k. of section 1 of P.L.2023, c.243 (C.56:8-229). Perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances or PFAS means the same as that term is defined in subsection k. of section 1 of P.L.2023, c.243 (C.56:8-229). b.  Beginning two years after the effective date of this act, no person shall sell, offer for sale, manufacture, or distribute for sale or use in the State any apparel containing intentionally added PFAS. c.  A violation of the provisions of subsection b. of this section shall constitute an unlawful practice for the purposes of P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.), and the violator shall be subject to all remedies and penalties available pursuant to P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.). 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.